Utah statutes.
62A-11-703.   Alternative payment by obligor through electronic funds transfer.

(1)  The office may enter into a written alternative payment agreement with an obligor which provides for electronic payment of child support under Part 4, Income Withholding in IV-D Cases, or Part 5, Income Withholding in Non IV-D Cases.  Electronic payment shall be accomplished through an automatic withdrawal from the obligor's account at a financial institution.

(2)  The alternative payment agreement shall:

(a)  provide for electronic payment of child support in lieu of income withholding;

(b)  specify the date on which electronic payments will be withdrawn from an obligor's account; and

(c)  specify the amount which will be withdrawn.

(3)  The office may terminate the agreement and initiate immediate income withholding if:

(a)  required to meet federal or state requirements or guidelines;

(b)  funds available in the account at the scheduled time of withdrawal are insufficient to satisfy the agreement; or

(c)  requested by the obligor.

(4)  If the payment amount requires adjusting, the office may initiate a new written agreement with the obligor.  If, for any reason, the office and obligor fail to agree on the terms, the office may terminate the agreement and initiate income withholding.

(5)  If an agreement is terminated for insufficient funds, a new agreement may not be entered into between the office and obligor for a period of at least 12 months.

(6)  The office shall make rules specifying eligibility requirements for obligors to enter into alternative payment agreements.

